Washington statutes.
RCW 15.04.010

Definitions.

As used in this title except where otherwise defined:

"Department" means the department of agriculture.

"Director" means the director of agriculture.

"Person" includes any individual, firm, corporation, trust, association, cooperative, copartnership, society, any other organization of individuals, and any other business unit, device, or arrangement.

[ 1961 c 11 s 15.04.010. Prior: (i) 1941 c 56 s 3; Rem. Supp. 1941 s 2828-4. (ii) 1941 c 56 s 4; Rem. Supp. 1941 s 2828-5. (iii) 1943 c 150 s 1, part; 1937 c 148 s 1, part; 1927 c 311 s 1, part; 1921 c 141 s 1, part; 1915 c 166 s 1, part; Rem. Supp. 1943 s 2839, part.]